Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1112
Committed offender; responsibilities; failure to comply; effect; not an agent, employee, or servant of this state.

(1) A committed offender assigned to a community work release and reentry center shall obey the center's rules of behavior and shall consistently maintain such offender's scheduled work hours.

(2) The intentional failure of a committed offender to abide by the rules of such offender's assigned center may result in internal disciplinary sanction, termination of the committed offender's placement with the center, and the immediate return of such offender to the custody of the department.

(3) No committed offender who is employed in the community under the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act or otherwise released from custody shall, while working in such employment in the community, going to or from such employment, or during the time of such release, be deemed to be an agent, employee, or servant of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 12.